Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Chapter 13. Distributions

§ 13.01.
Prohibited distributions.

Except as authorized by section 13.02 of this title, a corporation shall not make any distributions.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 13.02.
Authorized distributions.

A mutual benefit corporation may purchase its memberships if after the purchase is completed:

the corporation would be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its activities; and

the corporation’s total assets would at least equal the sum of its total liabilities.

A public benefit corporation and a mutual benefit corporation may make distributions upon dissolution in conformity with chapter 14 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.